Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6038
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-6038 to 71-6042:

(1) Complicated feeding problems include, but are not limited to, difficulty swallowing, recurrent lung aspirations, and tube or parenteral or intravenous feedings;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(3) Nurse aide means any person employed by a service provider or facility described in subsection (1) of section 71-6039 for the purpose of aiding a licensed registered or practical nurse through the performance of nonspecialized tasks related to the personal care and comfort of residents other than a paid dining assistant or a licensed registered or practical nurse;

(4) Nursing home means any facility or a distinct part of any facility that provides care as defined in sections 71-420, 71-421, 71-422, 71-424, and 71-429;

(5) Paid dining assistant means any person employed by a nursing home for the purpose of aiding a licensed registered or practical nurse through the feeding of residents other than a nurse aide or a licensed registered or practical nurse; and

(6) Service provider means a person certified by the department to provide developmental disabilities services.

Laws 1983, LB 273, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 416, § 10;

Laws 1988, LB 190, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 1080, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 148;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 749;

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 40;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 110;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 642;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1235;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 13;

Laws 2025, LB42, § 1.